Utah statutes.
78B-15-805.   Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.
Subject to the jurisdictional standards of Section 78B-13-201, the tribunal
conducting a proceeding under this part has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction
of all matters arising out of the gestational agreement until a child born to
the gestational mother during the period governed by the agreement attains the
age of 180 days.
